Hawaii statutes.
§46-64 Disposition of surplus property.
Any other law to the contrary notwithstanding, any county may give, sell, or
transfer any of its surplus personal property to the State or to any county
within the State. [L 1965, c 251, §1; Supp, §138-54; HRS §46-64]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next